Hawaii statutes.
§302A-1130.6 Curricular materials fee
special account. There is established within the department a curricular
materials fee special account, into which shall be deposited all fees and
charges collected from students or their parents or guardians for the loss,
destruction, breakage, or damage of curricular materials. Disbursements from
this special account shall be expended by the department for the purposes of
purchasing, replacing, or repairing curricular materials. [L 2004, c 220, §1;
am L 2012, c 133, §18; am L 2016, c 112, §3]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next